Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.040

Education providers—Additional authority and limitations.

School districts and educational service districts providing an education program to juvenile inmates in an adult corrections [correctional] facility, notwithstanding that their geographical boundaries do not include the facility, may:

(1) Award appropriate diplomas or certificates to inmates who successfully complete graduation requirements;

(2) Spend only funds appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for the exclusive purpose of maintaining and operating education programs under this chapter, including direct and indirect costs of maintaining and operating the education programs, and funds from federal and private grants, bequests, and gifts made for that purpose. School districts may not expend excess tax levy proceeds authorized for school district purposes to pay costs incurred under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 244 s 5.]